Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.370

Application of Article 5 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

The provisions of Article 5 of chapter 23.95 RCW and RCW 24.06.367 and 24.06.369 shall apply to every foreign corporation which desires to conduct affairs in this state under the authority of this chapter.

[ 2015 c 176 s 9111; 1989 c 307 s 33.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.